Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 21, paragraph b, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: A set of core academic indicators in mathematics and reading in grades four, eight, and eleven, a set of core academic indicators in science and social studies in grades eight and ten, and another set of core indicators that includes but is not limited to graduation rate, postsecondary education, and House File 2670, p. 2 successful employment in Iowa. Annually, the department shall report state data for each indicator in the condition of education report. Sec. 2. Section 256.7, subsection 21, paragraph b, subparagraph (2), subparagraph divisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: (a) That all students enrolled in school districts in grades three through eleven be administered an assessment in mathematics and English language arts, including reading and writing, during the last quarter of the school year and all students enrolled in school districts in grades five, eight, and ten be administered an assessment in science during the last quarter of the school year the following assessments during the last quarter of the school year: (i) In grades three through eleven, an assessment in mathematics and English language arts, including reading and writing . (ii) In grades five, eight, and eleven, an assessment in science. (iii) In grades eight and eleven, an assessment in social studies. (b) That the assessment, at a minimum, assess the core academic indicators identified in this paragraph âbâ ; be aligned with the Iowa common core standards in both content and rigor; accurately describe student achievement and growth for purposes of the school, the school district, and state accountability systems; provide valid, reliable, and fair measures of student progress toward college or career readiness; and meet the summative assessment requirements of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95 , if applicable . (c) That the assessment be available for administration in both paper-and-pencil and computer-based formats and include assessments in mathematics, science, social studies, and English language arts, including reading and writing. (d) That the assessment be peer-reviewed by an independent, third-party evaluator to determine that the assessment is aligned with the Iowa core academic standards, provides a measurement of student growth and student proficiency, and House File 2670, p. 3 meets the summative assessment requirements of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95 , if applicable . The assessment developed by the Iowa testing program within the university of Iowa college of education shall be adjusted as necessary to meet the requirements of this subparagraph (2) as determined by the peer review. Sec. 3. Section 256.7, subsection 33, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. Adopt rules to require school districts to adopt protocols for suicide prevention and postvention and the identification of adverse childhood experiences and strategies to mitigate toxic stress response . The protocols shall be based on nationally recognized best practices. Sec. 4. Section 256.9, subsection 49, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. Convene an advisory group comprised of education stakeholders including but not limited to school district and accredited nonpublic school teachers, school administrators, higher education faculty who teach in the subjects for which the curriculum is being adopted, private sector employers, members of the boards of directors of school districts, and individuals representing the educational assessment providers. The task force shall review the national assessment of educational progress standards and assessments used by other states, and shall consider standards identified as best practices in the field of study by the national councils of teachers of English and mathematics, the national council for the social studies, the national science teachers association, and other recognized experts. Sec. 5. Section 256.9, subsection 64, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 64. Develop and distribute to school districts standards of practice for equity coordinators employed by school districts. To provide consistency in training statewide, the director shall also develop and distribute to school districts a training program on free speech under the first amendment to the Constitution of the United States which shall be used by school districts to provide training pursuant to section 279.75 . House File 2670, p. 4 Sec. 6. Section 256.11, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: The state board shall adopt rules under chapter 17A and a procedure for accrediting all public and nonpublic schools in Iowa offering instruction at any or all levels from the prekindergarten level through grade twelve. The rules of the state board shall require that an age-appropriate , multicultural, and gender-fair approach is used by schools and school districts. The educational program shall be taught from an age-appropriate , multicultural, and gender-fair approach. Global perspectives shall be incorporated into all levels of the educational program. The rules adopted by the state board pursuant to section 256.17, Code Supplement 1987 , to establish new standards shall satisfy the requirements of this section to adopt rules to implement the educational program contained in this section . The educational program shall be as follows: Sec. 7. Section 256.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2. The kindergarten program shall include experiences designed to develop healthy emotional and social habits and growth in the language arts and communication skills, as well as a capacity for the completion of individual tasks, and protect and increase physical well-being with attention given to experiences relating to the development of life skills and, subject to section 279.80 , age-appropriate and research-based human growth and development . A kindergarten teacher shall be licensed to teach in kindergarten. An accredited nonpublic school must meet the requirements of this subsection only if the nonpublic school offers a kindergarten program; provided, however, that section 279.80 shall not apply to a nonpublic school. Sec. 8. Section 256.11, subsection 3, paragraph a, subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (5) Health. The health curriculum shall include the characteristics of communicable diseases all of the following: (a) The characteristics of communicable diseases . (b) Physical fitness. (c) Nutrition. Sec. 9. Section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph a, House File 2670, p. 5 subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (5) Health. The health curriculum shall include age-appropriate and research-based information regarding the characteristics of sexually transmitted diseases all of the following: (a) Age-appropriate and research-based information regarding the characteristics of sexually transmitted diseases . (b) Physical fitness. (c) Nutrition. Sec. 10. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraphs e and j, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: e. Two additional units of mathematics. The two additional units of mathematics may include instruction related to applied any of the following: (1) Agriculture, which may be offered and taught through dedicated units of coursework or through units of coursework that also meet the requirements of the coursework required under paragraph âhâ , subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a). (2) Applied sciences, technology, engineering, or manufacturing, including transportation, distribution, logistics, architecture, and construction, which may be offered and taught through dedicated units of coursework or through units of coursework that also meet the requirements of the coursework required under paragraph âhâ , subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (c). (3) The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this paragraph. j. (1) One unit of health education which . (a) The one unit of health education shall include instruction related to all of the following: (i) Physical fitness. (ii) Food and nutrition. (iii) Personal health. (b) The one unit of health education may include personal health; food and nutrition; environmental instruction related to all of the following: (i) Environmental health ; safety . (ii) Safety and survival skills ; consumer . House File 2670, p. 6 (iii) Consumer health ; family . (iv) Family life ; age-appropriate . (v) Age-appropriate and research-based human growth and development that incorporates the standards established under section 279.50, subsection 3 , paragraph âbâ ; substance . (vi) Substance use disorder and nonuse ; emotional and social health; health . (vii) Health resources ; cardiopulmonary . (viii) Cardiopulmonary resuscitation ; and prevention . (ix) Prevention and control of disease, including age-appropriate and research-based information regarding sexually transmitted diseases. (2) The state board , as part of accreditation standards , shall adopt curriculum standards for implementing the program in grades nine through twelve. Sec. 11. Section 256.11, subsection 9A, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9A. Beginning July 1, 2007, each school district shall have a qualified guidance counselor who shall be licensed by the board of educational examiners under subchapter VII, part 3 . Each school district shall work toward the goal of having one qualified guidance counselor for every three hundred fifty students enrolled in the school district. The state board shall establish in rule a definition of and standards for an articulated sequential kindergarten through grade twelve guidance and counseling program. The program shall be designed to ensure that the guidance counselor can work works collaboratively with parents or guardians, students, teachers, support staff, and administrators to support the curricular goals of the school by offering responsive services that address the growth and development needs of students and the attainment of student competencies in academic, career, and social areas. Sec. 12. Section 256.11, subsection 10, paragraph c, subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: If, after having an opportunity to correct, if permitted, a school district is found to be in noncompliance with federal education laws including but not limited to the federal House File 2670, p. 7 Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1400 et seq., as amended, the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, chapter 216 , section 279.73 , or section 279.74 , the director shall recommend, and the state board may shall do, one of the following within thirty days of the finding of noncompliance: Sec. 13. Section 256.37, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3. Students graduating from Iowaâs education system must demonstrate competency in challenging subject matter, and must have learned to use their minds well, so they may be prepared for responsible citizenship, further learning, and productive employment in a global Iowaâs economy. Sec. 14. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph h, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) The educational standards of section 256.11, subsection 2, related to the kindergarten program. NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (002) The educational standards of section 256.11, subsection 3, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (5), related to the health curriculum. NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (0002) The educational standards of section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (5), related to the health curriculum. Sec. 15. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph h, subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (3) The educational standards established in section 256.11, subsection 5 , paragraph âeâ , related to the use of instruction related to agriculture or applied sciences, technology, engineering, or manufacturing to fulfill a portion of the unit requirements related to mathematics. Sec. 16. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph r, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: r. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 279.81 relating to prohibiting students from serving on any committees that determine, or provide recommendations related to, whether a material in a school library should be removed in the same manner as a school district . Sec. 17. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, paragraphs p, r, and House File 2670, p. 8 t, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: p. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 279.81 relating to prohibiting students from serving on any committees that determine, or provide recommendations related to, whether a material in a school library should be removed in the same manner as a school district . r. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 256.11, subsection 5 , paragraph âeâ , relating to the use of instruction related to agriculture or applied sciences, technology, engineering, or manufacturing to fulfill a portion of the unit requirements related to mathematics in the same manner as a school district. t. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 256.11 relating to the human growth and development curriculum for grades five through eight , and the health curriculum for grades nine through twelve , in the same manner as a school district . Sec. 18. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . 0q. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 256.11, subsection 2, relating to the kindergarten program in the same manner as a school district. NEW PARAGRAPH . 00q. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 256.11, subsection 3, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (5), relating to the health curriculum in the same manner as a school district. NEW PARAGRAPH . 000q. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (5), relating to the health curriculum in the same manner as a school district. Sec. 19. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid received by the school district under section 257.16. This specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act House File 2670, p. 9 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school districts. Sec. 20. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to school years beginning on or after July 1, 2027: The portion of the section of this Act amending section 256.7, subsection 21, paragraph âbâ, subparagraph (2), that relates to the administration of assessments in social studies. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2670, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor